New Jersey, session 222, S1592.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The board of education of a school district shall not adopt a policy, or otherwise engage in a practice, that prohibits or in effect prevents any active member of the United States military or a veteran of the United States military from speaking to or otherwise addressing students, sports teams, student clubs, or any other group or assemblage of students of the district including, but not limited to, school-sponsored events, classes, school assemblies, and graduation ceremonies. b.  A school district shall forward to the appropriate executive county superintendent any correspondence between the district and an active member of the United States military or a veteran of the United States military who is seeking to speak or otherwise address students, sports teams, student clubs, or any other group or assemblage of students of the district. c. The Commissioner of Education is hereby authorized to withhold all or part of a district's State aid provided pursuant to P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.) for failure to comply with the provisions of subsection a. of this section. 2.  a.  The governing board of a public institution of higher education shall not adopt a policy, or otherwise engage in a practice, that prohibits or in effect prevents any active member of the United States military or a veteran of the United States military from speaking to or otherwise addressing students, sports teams, student clubs, or any other group or assemblage of students of the institution including, but not limited to, school-sponsored events, classes, school assemblies, and graduation ceremonies. b. In the event that a public institution of higher education violates the provisions of this section, the State Treasurer is hereby authorized to withhold all or part of the institutions State operating aid. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.